Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska1-108.01
Board; conflicts of interest; rules and regulations.

The board shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which establish definitions of conflicts of interest for its members and which establish procedures to be followed in case such conflicts arise.

Laws 1984, LB 473, § 3;

Laws 1997, LB 114, § 6.